Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1552
Initiative or referendum petition; sponsor's affidavit; falsely swearing; penalty.

Any person who knowingly and falsely swears to a sponsor's affidavit on a petition filed under section 32-1407 shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

Laws 2024, LB287, § 64.